Tennessee, session 114, HB0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-206(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
( ) "Emergency medical responder" means an emergency medical technician,
emergency medical technician-paramedic, or paramedic;
( ) "Law enforcement officer" means an individual employed by this state or a
local government as a member of a law enforcement agency whose primary
responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime and the apprehension of
offenders;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-206(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) "Employer" means:
(A) A municipality, county, metropolitan form of government, or other
political subdivision of this state that employs firefighters, law enforcement
officers, or emergency medical responders;
(B) This state or an agency of this state for purposes of employment of a
law enforcement officer;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-206, is amended by deleting
from subsections (c) and (d) the language "firefighter" and substituting "firefighter, law
enforcement officer, or emergency medical responder"; and is further amended by deleting from
HB0310
001833
- 1 -

subsection (d) the language "firefighter's" and substituting "firefighter's, law enforcement
officer's, or emergency medical responder's"; and is further amended by deleting from
subsection (d) the language "fire department".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001833